Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.115

Holocaust instruction—Preparation and availability of instructional materials.

(1) Every public middle school, junior high school, and high school is strongly encouraged to include in its curriculum instruction on the events of the period in modern world history known as the Holocaust, the systemic, German state-sponsored persecution and murder of Jews and other innocent victims by the Nazi regime and its collaborators between the years 1933 and 1945. The instruction may also include other examples of genocide and crimes against humanity. The studying of this material is intended to: Examine the ramifications of prejudice, racism, and intolerance; prepare students to be responsible citizens in a pluralistic democracy; and be a reaffirmation of the commitment of free peoples never again to permit such occurrences.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with an expert Washington nonprofit organization that teaches the lessons of the Holocaust, must:

(a) Develop best practices and guidelines for high quality instruction under this section; and

(b) Encourage and support middle school, junior high school, and high school teachers in implementing these best practices and guidelines.

(3) Beginning September 1, 2020, middle schools, junior high schools, and high schools that offer instruction as described in subsection (1) of this section must follow the best practices and guidelines developed under subsection (2) of this section.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must electronically publish the best practices and guidelines developed under this section on an annual basis.

[ 2019 c 85 s 1; 1992 c 24 s 1.]